Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that with the enactment of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801 during the 2025 legislative session, the legislature addressed the state transportation system's pressing near, mid, and long-term needs that necessitated reliance on reliable funding resources, as well as the efficient use of those resources. Because the production, maintenance, and utilization of transportation resources across the state continues to be an inherently complex, multifaceted issue, the legislature intends with this act to continue to address these resource needs by addressing certain topics from Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801, and associated matters, that require additional legislative work.PART I: MOBILE DRIVER'S LICENSE AND IDENTICARD AND $1 DRIVER'S LICENSE/IDENTICARD FEE INCREASENEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 101. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:"Mobile credential" is the electronic extension of the department's normally issued physical version that conveys identity, driving privilege, or both, that resides on a mobile device or requires a mobile device as part of the process to gain access to the related information.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 102. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:"Relying party" is any federal, state, local, or private entity where a mobile credential may be presented for verification purposes. Relying parties shall authenticate an electronic credential in accordance with applicable American association of motor vehicle administrators and international organization for standardization standards prior to acceptance of the electronic credential.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 103. A new section is added to chapter 1.80 RCW to read as follows:(1) If a law requires a person to provide proof of identification, the requirement may be satisfied with a mobile credential so long as the mobile credential is electronically verified. Each governmental agency of the state shall determine whether, and the extent to which, a governmental agency will accept a mobile credential. However, as required under RCW 46.20.017, a licensee must have the licensee's physical credential on the licensee's person while operating a motor vehicle.(2) Relying parties shall only retain data from a mobile credential for which the relying party explicitly obtained consent from the credential holder. Relying parties must inform the credential holder of the use and retention period of the mobile credential data.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 104. A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:(1) By July 1, 2028, the department must establish a program that allows every qualifying applicant for a driver's license or identicard the ability to acquire a mobile credential in addition to the physical version of these documents.(2) By January 1, 2028, the department must adopt rules to implement subsection (1) of this section, which include, but are not limited to, issuance and verification requirements, expiration date, security and privacy protections, and the uses associated with the mobile credential.Sec. 105. RCW 46.20.161 and 2025 c 417 s 305 and 2025 c 217 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The department, upon receipt of a fee as specified in (b) of this subsection, shall issue to every qualifying applicant a driver's license. A driver's license issued to a person under the age of 18 is an intermediate license, subject to the restrictions imposed under RCW 46.20.075, until the person reaches the age of 18.(b)(i) The driver's license fee shall be $10 for each year that the license is issued, which includes the fee for the required photograph.(ii) Beginning July 1, 2028, and on July 1st every three years thereafter, the fee under (b)(i) of this subsection must be increased by $1 for each year that the license is issued.(2) The license must include:(a) A distinguishing number assigned to the licensee;(b) The name of record;(c) Date of birth;(d) Washington residence address;(e) Photograph;(f) A brief description of the licensee;(g) Either a facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space upon which the licensee shall write the licensees' usual signature with pen and ink immediately upon receipt of the license;(h) If applicable, the person's status as a veteran as provided in subsection (4) of this section;(i) If applicable, a medical alert designation as provided in subsection (5) of this section; and(j) At the option of the licensee, the inclusion of the licensee's blood type, provided that the licensee presents documentation verifying the blood type from a licensed physician, medical facility, or blood donation organization.(3) No license is valid until it has been signed by the licensee.(4)(a) A veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, may apply to the department to obtain a veteran designation on a driver's license issued under this section by providing:(i) A United States department of veterans affairs identification card or proof of service letter;(ii) A United States department of defense discharge document, DD Form 214 or DD Form 215, as it exists on June 7, 2018, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, or equivalent or successor discharge paperwork, that establishes the person's service in the armed forces of the United States and qualifying discharge as defined in RCW 73.04.005;(iii) A national guard state-issued report of separation and military service, NGB Form 22, as it exists on June 7, 2018, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, or equivalent or successor discharge paperwork, that establishes the person's active duty or reserve service in the national guard and qualifying discharge as defined in RCW 73.04.005; or(iv) A United States uniformed services identification card, DD Form 2, that displays on its face that it has been issued to a retired member of any of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves.(b) The department may permit a veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, to submit alternate forms of documentation to apply to obtain a veteran designation on a driver's license.(5) Any person may apply to the department to obtain a medical alert designation, a developmental disability designation, or a deafness designation on a driver's license issued under this chapter by providing:(a) Self-attestation that the individual:(i) Has a medical condition that could affect communication or account for a driver health emergency;(ii) Is deaf or hard of hearing; or(iii) Has a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020;(b) A statement from the person that they have voluntarily provided the self-attestation and other information verifying the condition; and(c) For persons under 18 years of age or who have a developmental disability, the signature of a parent or legal guardian.(6) A self-attestation or data contained in a self-attestation provided under this section:(a) Shall not be disclosed;(b) Is for the confidential use of the director, the chief of the Washington state patrol, and law enforcement and emergency medical service providers as designated by law; and(c) Is subject to the privacy protections of the driver's privacy protection act, 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2725.(7) By July 1, 2028, the department must establish a program that allows every qualifying applicant for a driver's license issued under this section the ability to acquire a mobile credential in addition to the physical version of this document.Sec. 106. RCW 46.20.117 and 2025 c 417 s 307 and 2025 c 217 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing a picture, if the applicant:(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;(b) Proves the applicant's identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; and(c) Pays the required fee as specified in subsection (7) of this section, unless an applicant is:(i) A recipient of continuing public assistance grants under Title 74 RCW, or a participant in the Washington women, infants, and children program. Any applicant under this subsection must be verified by documentation sufficient to demonstrate eligibility;(ii) Under the age of 25 and does not have a permanent residence address as determined by the department by rule; or(iii) An individual who is scheduled to be released from an institution as defined in RCW 13.40.020, a community facility as defined in RCW 72.05.020, a correctional facility as defined in RCW 72.09.015, or other juvenile rehabilitation facility operated by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families; or an individual who has been released from such an institution or facility within 30 calendar days before the date of the application.For those persons under (c)(i) through (iii) of this subsection, the fee must be the actual cost of production of the identicard.(2)(a) Design and term. The identicard must:(i) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the official driver's license; and(ii) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, expire on the eighth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate after issuance.(b) The identicard may include the person's status as a veteran, consistent with RCW 46.20.161(4).(c) If applicable, the identicard may include a medical alert designation as provided in subsection (5) of this section.(d) If applicable, the identicard may include an optional blood type designation consistent with RCW 46.20.161(2)(j).(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be submitted by means of:(a) Personal appearance before the department;(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the department and if the applicant did not renew the identicard by mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired; or(c) From January 1, 2022, to June 30, 2024, electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the department.An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of the identicard holder.(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.(5) Any person may apply to the department to obtain a medical alert designation, a developmental disability designation, or a deafness designation on an identicard issued under this chapter by providing:(a) Self-attestation that the individual:(i) Has a medical condition that could affect communication or account for a health emergency;(ii) Is deaf or hard of hearing; or(iii) Has a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020;(b) A statement from the person that they have voluntarily provided the self-attestation and other information verifying the condition; and(c) For persons under 18 years of age or who have a developmental disability, the signature of a parent or legal guardian.(6) A self-attestation or data contained in a self-attestation provided under this section:(a) Shall not be disclosed; and(b) Is for the confidential use of the director, the chief of the Washington state patrol, and law enforcement and emergency medical service providers as designated by law.(7) Alternative issuance/renewal/extension.(a) Except as allowed under this subsection, the department must issue or renew an identicard for eight years. The department may issue or renew an identicard for a period other than eight years, or may extend by mail or electronic commerce an identicard that has already been issued. The fee for an identicard issued or renewed, or that has been extended by mail or electronic commerce, is $10 for each year that the identicard is issued, renewed, or extended. The department must offer the option to issue or renew an identicard for six years in addition to the eight year issuance. The department may adopt any rules as are necessary to carry out this subsection.(b) Beginning July 1, 2028, and on July 1st every three years thereafter, the fee under (a) of this subsection must be increased by $1 for each year that the identicard is issued, renewed, or extended.(8) Identicard photos must be updated in the same manner as driver's license photos under RCW 46.20.120(5).(9) By July 1, 2028, the department must establish a program that allows every qualifying applicant for an identicard issued under this section the ability to acquire a mobile credential in addition to the physical version of this document.Sec. 107. RCW 46.20.202 and 2022 c 182 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department may enter into a memorandum of understanding with any federal agency for the purposes of facilitating the crossing of the border between the state of Washington and the Canadian province of British Columbia.(2) The department may enter into an agreement with the Canadian province of British Columbia for the purposes of implementing a border-crossing initiative.(3)(a) The department may issue an enhanced driver's license or identicard for the purposes of crossing the border between the state of Washington and the Canadian province of British Columbia to an applicant who provides the department with proof of: United States citizenship, identity, and state residency. The department shall continue to offer a standard driver's license and identicard. If the department chooses to issue an enhanced driver's license, the department must allow each applicant to choose between a standard driver's license or identicard, or an enhanced driver's license or identicard.(b) The department shall implement a one-to-many biometric matching system for the enhanced driver's license or identicard. An applicant for an enhanced driver's license or identicard shall submit a biometric identifier as designated by the department. The biometric identifier must be used solely for the purpose of verifying the identity of the holders and for any purpose set out in RCW 46.20.037. Applicants are required to sign a declaration acknowledging their understanding of the one-to-many biometric match.(c) The enhanced driver's license or identicard must include reasonable security measures to protect the privacy of Washington state residents, including reasonable safeguards to protect against unauthorized disclosure of data about Washington state residents. If the enhanced driver's license or identicard includes a radio frequency identification chip, or similar technology, the department shall ensure that the technology is encrypted or otherwise secure from unauthorized data access.(d) The requirements of this subsection are in addition to the requirements otherwise imposed on applicants for a driver's license or identicard. The department shall adopt such rules as necessary to meet the requirements of this subsection. From time to time the department shall review technological innovations related to the security of identity cards and amend the rules related to enhanced driver's licenses and identicards as the director deems consistent with this section and appropriate to protect the privacy of Washington state residents.(e) Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.118, the department may make images associated with enhanced drivers' licenses or identicards from the negative file available to United States customs and border agents for the purposes of verifying identity.(4) Beginning October 1, 2022, the fee for an enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard is $56, which is in addition to the fees for any regular driver's license or identicard. If the enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard is issued, renewed, or extended for a period other than eight years, the fee for each class is $7 for each year that the enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard is issued, renewed, or extended.(5)(a) The first $4 per year of issuance, to a maximum of $32 of the enhanced driver's license and enhanced identicard fee under this section must be deposited into the highway safety fund unless prior to July 1, 2023, the actions described in (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection occur, in which case the portion of the revenue that is the result of the fee increased in section 209, chapter 44, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. must be distributed to the connecting Washington account created under RCW 46.68.395.(i) Any state agency files a notice of rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW, absent explicit legislative authorization enacted subsequent to July 1, 2015, for a rule regarding a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard.(ii) Any state agency otherwise enacts, adopts, orders, or in any way implements a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard, without explicit legislative authorization enacted subsequent to July 1, 2015.(iii) Nothing in this subsection acknowledges, establishes, or creates legal authority for the department of ecology or any other state agency to enact, adopt, order, or in any way implement a fuel standard based upon or defined by the carbon intensity of fuel, including a low carbon fuel standard or clean fuel standard.(b) $24 of the enhanced driver's license and enhanced identicard fee under this section must be deposited into the move ahead WA flexible account created in RCW 46.68.520. If the enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard is issued, renewed, or extended for a period other than eight years, the amount deposited into the move ahead WA flexible account created in RCW 46.68.520 is $3 for each year that the enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard is issued, renewed, or extended.(6) By July 1, 2028, the department must establish a program that allows every qualifying applicant for an enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard issued under this section the ability to acquire a mobile credential in addition to the physical version of this document.Sec. 108. RCW 46.20.037 and 2024 c 54 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department may implement a facial recognition matching system for drivers' licenses, permits, and identicards. Any facial recognition matching system selected by the department must be used only to verify ((the)):(a) The identity of an applicant for or holder of a driver's license, permit, or identicard to determine whether the person has been issued a driver's license, permit, or identicard under a different name or names; and(b) The identity of an applicant for purposes of application and issuance for a mobile credential of the documents under (a) of this subsection.(2) Any facial recognition matching system selected by the department must be capable of highly accurate matching, and must be compliant with appropriate standards established by the American association of motor vehicle administrators that exist on June 7, 2012, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.(3) The department shall post notices in conspicuous locations at all department driver licensing offices, make written information available to all applicants at department driver licensing offices, and provide information on the department's website regarding the facial recognition matching system. The notices, written information, and information on the website must address how the facial recognition matching system works, all ways in which the department may use results from the facial recognition matching system, how an investigation based on results from the facial recognition matching system would be conducted, and a person's right to appeal any determinations made under this chapter.(4) Results from the facial recognition matching system:(a) Are not available for public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW;(b) May only be disclosed when authorized by a court order;(c) May only be disclosed to a federal government agency if specifically required under federal law; and(d) May only be disclosed by the department to a government agency, including a court or law enforcement agency, for use in carrying out its functions if the department has determined that person has committed one of the prohibited practices listed in RCW 46.20.0921 and this determination has been confirmed by a hearings examiner under this chapter or the person declined a hearing or did not attend a scheduled hearing.(5) All personally identifying information derived from the facial recognition matching system must be stored with appropriate security safeguards. Washington technology solutions shall develop the appropriate security standards for the department's use of the facial recognition matching system, subject to approval and oversight by the technology services board.(6) The department shall develop procedures to handle instances in which the facial recognition matching system fails to verify the identity of an applicant for a renewal or duplicate driver's license, permit, or identicard. These procedures must allow an applicant to prove identity without using the facial recognition matching system.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 109. A new section is added to chapter 46.22 RCW to read as follows:Any data collected by the department and displayed on a mobile credential, will be handled the same as data collected for the issuance of a physical credential and protected and shared in accordance with this chapter, chapter 42.56 RCW, and RCW 43.17.425 and 7.115.020.Sec. 110. RCW 46.20.1201 and 2021 c 240 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An additional $1 fee shall be imposed on each application for an original or renewal of a regular driver's license, regular identicard, enhanced driver's license, or enhanced identicard. The entire amount of the fee shall be used to pay for processing costs for driver's license issuance and reinstatements, and information technology upgrades and the ongoing costs to maintain the driver's license and identicard record and issuance system.(2) An additional $1 mobile driver's license and identicard fee shall be imposed on each application for an original or renewal of a regular driver's license, regular identicard, enhanced driver's license, or enhanced identicard. The entire amount of the fee shall be used to pay for costs associated with providing an optional mobile credential in addition to the physical version of a driver's license or identicard to qualifying applicants.(3) The department shall forward all funds accruing under this section to the state treasurer who shall deposit the moneys to the credit of the highway safety fund.PART II: TRANSIT GRANTSSec. 201. RCW 47.66.130 and 2022 c 182 s 416 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall establish a bus and bus facilities grant program. The purpose of this competitive grant program is to provide grants to any transit authority for the replacement, expansion, rehabilitation, and purchase of transit rolling stock; construction, modification, or rehabilitation of transit facilities; safety or security enhancements for transit rolling stock or transit facilities; and funding to adapt to technological change or innovation through the retrofitting of transit rolling stock and facilities.(2)(a) The department must incorporate environmental justice principles into the grant selection process, with the goal of increasing the distribution of funding to communities based on addressing environmental harms and provide environmental benefits for overburdened communities, as defined in RCW 70A.02.010, and vulnerable populations.(b) The department must incorporate geographic diversity into the grant selection process.(c) No grantee may receive more than 35 percent of the amount appropriated for the grant program in a particular biennium.(d) Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.(e) Grant funds may not be used for any expenses relating to armed security.(3) The department must establish an advisory committee to carry out the mandates of this section, including assisting with the establishment of grant criteria.(4) The department must report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature on the status of any grant projects funded by the program created under this section.(5) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Transit authority" means a city transit system under RCW 35.58.2721 or chapter 35.95A RCW, a county public transportation authority under chapter 36.57 RCW, a metropolitan municipal corporation transit system under chapter 36.56 RCW, a public transportation benefit area under chapter 36.57A RCW, an unincorporated transportation benefit area under RCW 36.57.100, or any special purpose district formed to operate a public transportation system.(b) "Transit rolling stock" means transit vehicles including, but not limited to, buses, ferries, and vans.PART III: BICYCLE EDUCATION GRANT PROGRAMSec. 301. RCW 47.04.390 and 2025 c 417 s 711 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The department shall establish a statewide school-based bicycle education grant program. The grant will support two programs: One for grades three through eight; and one for grades six through 12 aged youth to develop the skills and street safety knowledge to be more confident bicyclists for transportation and/or recreation. In development of the grant program, the department is encouraged to consult with the environmental justice council and the office of equity.(b) Youth participating in the school-based bicycle education grant program shall have an opportunity to receive a bike, lock, helmet, and lights, and maintenance supplies free of cost.(2) For the grades ((through)) three through eight and grades six through 12 programs, the department shall contract with a nonprofit organization with relevant reach and experience, including a statewide footprint and demonstrable experience deploying bicycling and road safety education curriculum via a train the trainer model in schools. The selected nonprofit shall identify partner schools and partner organizations that serve target populations, based on the criteria in subsection (4) of this section. Partner schools shall receive from the nonprofit: In-school bike and pedestrian safety education curriculum, materials, equipment guidance and consultation, and physical education teacher training. Selected school districts shall receive and maintain a fleet of bicycles for the youth in the program.(3) For the grades six through 12 program, the department shall contract with a nonprofit organization with relevant reach and experience, including a statewide footprint; demonstrable experience developing and managing youth-based programming serving youth of color in an after-school and/or community setting; and deploying bicycling and road safety education curriculum via a train the trainer model. The selected nonprofit shall use the equity-based criteria in subsection (4) of this section to identify target populations and partner organizations including, but not limited to, schools, community-based organizations, housing authorities, and parks and recreation departments, that work with the eligible populations of youth. Partner organizations shall receive from the nonprofit: Education curriculum, materials, equipment including, but not limited to, bicycles, helmets, locks, and lights, guidance and consultation, and initial instructor/volunteer training, as well as ongoing support.(4) In selecting schools and partner organizations for the school-based bicycle education grant program, the department and nonprofit must consider, at a minimum, the following criteria:(a) Population impacted by poverty, as measured by free and reduced lunch population or 200 percent federal poverty level;(b) People of color;(c) People of Hispanic heritage;(d) People with disabilities;(e) Environmental health disparities, such as those indicated by the diesel pollution burden portion of the Washington environmental health disparities map developed by the department of health, or other similar indicators;(f) Location on or adjacent to an Indian reservation;(g) Geographic location throughout the state;(h) Crash experience involving pedestrians and bicyclists;(i) Access to a community facility or commercial center; and(j) Identified need in the state active transportation plan or a regional, county, or community plan.(5) The department shall submit a report for both programs to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022, and each December 1st thereafter identifying the selected programs and school districts for funding by the legislature. The report must also include the status of previously funded programs.(6) The statewide school-based bicycle education grant program account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the program activities described in this section.(7) Beginning September 2029, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer $3,375,000 from the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070 to the statewide school-based bicycle education grant program account created in this section.PART IV: FISH PASSAGE BARRIER CORRECTION PROJECTSSec. 401. RCW 77.55.181 and 2021 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) In order to receive the permit review and approval process created in this section, a fish habitat enhancement project must meet the criteria under this section and must be a project to accomplish one or more of the following tasks:(i) Elimination of human-made or caused fish passage barriers, including:(A) Culvert repair and replacement; ((and))(B) Fish passage barrier removal projects that comply with the forest practices rules, as the term "forest practices rules" is defined in RCW 76.09.020; and(C) Department of transportation fish passage barrier correction projects involving structures extending onto adjoining properties owned by others, where the department eliminates any portion of its barrier even if adjacent segments of such structures, including necessary transition segments to be constructed as part of the project, are determined to be a barrier to fish passage;(ii) Restoration of an eroded or unstable stream bank employing the principle of bioengineering, including limited use of rock as a stabilization only at the toe of the bank, and with primary emphasis on using native vegetation to control the erosive forces of flowing water;(iii) Placement of woody debris or other instream structures that benefit naturally reproducing fish stocks; or(iv) Restoration of native kelp and eelgrass beds and restoring native oysters.(b) The department shall develop size or scale threshold tests to determine if projects accomplishing any of these tasks should be evaluated under the process created in this section or under other project review and approval processes. A project proposal shall not be reviewed under the process created in this section if the department determines that the scale of the project raises concerns regarding public health and safety.(c) A fish habitat enhancement project must be approved in one of the following ways in order to receive the permit review and approval process created in this section:(i) By the department pursuant to chapter 77.95 or 77.100 RCW;(ii) By the sponsor of a watershed restoration plan as provided in chapter 89.08 RCW;(iii) By the department as a department-sponsored fish habitat enhancement or restoration project;(iv) Through the review and approval process for the jobs for the environment program;(v) By conservation districts as conservation district-sponsored fish habitat enhancement or restoration projects;(vi) Through a formal grant program established by the legislature or the department for fish habitat enhancement or restoration;(vii) By federally recognized tribes as tribally sponsored fish habitat enhancement projects or restoration projects;(viii) Through the department of transportation's environmental retrofit program as a stand-alone fish passage barrier correction project, or the fish passage barrier correction portion of a larger transportation project;(ix) Through a local, state, or federally approved fish barrier removal grant program designed to assist local governments in implementing stand-alone fish passage barrier corrections;(x) By a city or county for a stand-alone fish passage barrier correction project funded by the city or county;(xi) Through the approval process established for forest practices hydraulic projects in chapter 76.09 RCW; or(xii) Through other formal review and approval processes established by the legislature.(2) Fish habitat enhancement projects meeting the criteria of subsection (1) of this section are expected to result in beneficial impacts to the environment. Decisions pertaining to fish habitat enhancement projects meeting the criteria of subsection (1) of this section and being reviewed and approved according to the provisions of this section are not subject to the requirements of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).(3)(a) A permit is required for projects that meet the criteria of subsection (1) of this section and are being reviewed and approved under this section. An applicant shall use a joint aquatic resource permit application form developed by the office of regulatory assistance to apply for approval under this chapter. The department of transportation shall use the department's online permit application system or a joint aquatic resource permit application form developed by the office of regulatory assistance to apply for approval under this chapter. On the same day, the applicant shall provide copies of the completed application form to the department and to each appropriate local government. Applicants for a forest practices hydraulic project that are not otherwise required to submit a joint aquatic resource permit application must submit a copy of their forest practices application to the appropriate local government on the same day that they submit the forest practices application to the department of natural resources.(b) Local governments shall accept the application identified in this section as notice of the proposed project. A local government shall be provided with a 15-day comment period during which it may transmit comments regarding environmental impacts to the department or, for forest practices hydraulic projects, to the department of natural resources.(c)(i) Except for forest practices hydraulic projects, the department shall, within 45 days, either issue a permit, with or without conditions, deny approval, or make a determination that the review and approval process created by this section is not appropriate for the proposed project. The department shall base this determination on identification during the comment period of adverse impacts that cannot be mitigated by the conditioning of a permit. Permitting decisions over forest practices hydraulic approvals must be made consistent with chapter 76.09 RCW.(ii) For department of transportation fish passage barrier correction projects, the department of fish and wildlife shall, within 30 days, either issue a permit, with or without conditions, deny approval, or make a determination that the review and approval process created by this section is not appropriate for the proposed project.(d) If the department determines that the review and approval process created by this section is not appropriate for the proposed project, the department shall notify the applicant and the appropriate local governments of its determination. The applicant may reapply for approval of the project under other review and approval processes.(e) Any person aggrieved by the approval, denial, conditioning, or modification of a permit other than a forest practices hydraulic project under this section may appeal the decision as provided in RCW 77.55.021(8). Appeals of a forest practices hydraulic project may be made as provided in chapter 76.09 RCW.(4) No local government may require permits or charge fees for fish habitat enhancement projects that meet the criteria of subsection (1) of this section and that are reviewed and approved according to the provisions of this section, except that, pursuant to chapter 86.16 RCW, a local government may impose such requirements, or charge such fees, or both, only as may be necessary in order for the local government to administer the national flood insurance program regulation requirements.(5) No civil liability may be imposed by any court on the state or its officers and employees for any adverse impacts resulting from a fish enhancement project permitted by the department or the department of natural resources under the criteria of this section except upon proof of gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.PART V: CLEAN ENERGY FACILITIESSec. 501. RCW 47.04.010 and 2023 c 431 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The following words and phrases, wherever used in this title, shall have the meaning as in this section ascribed to them, unless where used the context thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary or unless otherwise defined in the chapter of which they are a part:(1) "Active transportation" includes forms of pedestrian mobility including walking or running, the use of a mobility assistive device such as a wheelchair, bicycling and cycling irrespective of the number of wheels, and the use of small personal devices such as foot scooters or skateboards. Active transportation includes both traditional and electric-assisted bicycles and other devices. Planning for active transportation must consider and address accommodation pursuant to the Americans with disabilities act and the distinct needs of each form of active transportation;(2) "Alley." A highway within the ordinary meaning of alley not designated for general travel and primarily used as a means of access to the rear of residences and business establishments;(3) "Arterial highway." Every highway, as herein defined, or portion thereof designated as such by proper authority;(4) "Business district." The territory contiguous to and including a highway, as herein defined, when within any 600 feet along such highway there are buildings in use for business or industrial purposes including, but not limited to, hotels, banks, or office buildings, railroad stations, and public buildings which occupy at least 300 feet of frontage on one side or 300 feet collectively on both sides of the highway;(5) "Center line." The line, marked or unmarked parallel to and equidistant from the sides of a two-way traffic roadway of a highway except where otherwise indicated by painted lines or markers;(6) "Center of intersection." The point of intersection of the center lines of the roadways of intersecting highways;(7) "City street." Every highway as herein defined, or part thereof located within the limits of incorporated cities and towns, except alleys;(8) "Clean energy facility" means any facility identified in RCW 43.21F.100(1);(9) "Combination of vehicles." Every combination of motor vehicle and motor vehicle, motor vehicle and trailer, or motor vehicle and semitrailer;(((9)))(10) "Commercial vehicle." Any vehicle the principal use of which is the transportation of commodities, merchandise, produce, freight, animals, or passengers for hire;(((10)))(11) "Complete streets" means an approach to planning, designing, building, operating, and maintaining streets that enable safe access along and across the street for all people, including pedestrians, bicyclists, motorists, and transit riders of all ages and abilities. It incorporates principles of a safe system approach;(((11)))(12) "County road." Every highway as herein defined, or part thereof, outside the limits of incorporated cities and towns and which has not been designated as a state highway, or branch thereof;(((12)))(13) "Crosswalk." The portion of the roadway between the intersection area and a prolongation or connection of the farthest sidewalk line or in the event there are no sidewalks then between the intersection area and a line ten feet therefrom, except as modified by a marked crosswalk;(((13)))(14) "Highway." Every way, lane, road, street, boulevard, and every way or place in the state of Washington open as a matter of right to public vehicular travel both inside and outside the limits of incorporated cities and towns;(((14)))(15) "Intersection area." (a) The area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, then the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two or more highways which join one another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways joining at any other angle may come in conflict;(b) Where a highway includes two roadways 30 feet or more apart, then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by an intersecting highway shall be regarded as a separate intersection. In the event such intersecting highway also includes two roadways 30 feet or more apart, then every crossing of two roadways of such highways shall be regarded as a separate intersection;(c) The junction of an alley with a street or highway shall not constitute an intersection;(((15)))(16) "Intersection control area." The intersection area as herein defined, together with such modification of the adjacent roadway area as results from the arc or curb corners and together with any marked or unmarked crosswalks adjacent to the intersection;(((16)))(17) "Laned highway." A highway the roadway of which is divided into clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic;(((17)))(18) "Local authorities." Every county, municipal, or other local public board or body having authority to adopt local police regulations under the Constitution and laws of this state;(((18)))(19) "Marked crosswalk." Any portion of a roadway distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface thereof;(((19)))(20) "Metal tire." Every tire, the bearing surface of which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other hard, nonresilient material;(((20)))(21) "Motor truck." Any motor vehicle, as herein defined, designed or used for the transportation of commodities, merchandise, produce, freight, or animals;(((21)))(22) "Motor vehicle." Every vehicle, as herein defined, which is in itself a self-propelled unit;(((22)))(23) "Multiple lane highway." Any highway the roadway of which is of sufficient width to reasonably accommodate two or more separate lanes of vehicular traffic in the same direction, each lane of which shall be not less than the maximum legal vehicle width, and whether or not such lanes are marked;(((23)))(24) "Operator." Every person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle as herein defined;(((24)))(25) "Peace officer." Any officer authorized by law to execute criminal process or to make arrests for the violation of the statutes generally or of any particular statute or statutes relative to the highways of this state;(((25)))(26) "Pedestrian." Any person afoot or who is using a wheelchair, power wheelchair as defined in RCW 46.04.415, or a means of conveyance propelled by human power other than a bicycle;(((26)))(27) "Person." Every natural person, firm, copartnership, corporation, association, or organization;(((27)))(28) "Personal wireless service." Any federally licensed personal wireless service;(((28)))(29) "Personal wireless service facilities." Unstaffed facilities that are used for the transmission or reception, or both, of personal wireless services including, but not necessarily limited to, antenna arrays, transmission cables, equipment shelters, and support structures;(((29)))(30) "Pneumatic tires." Every tire of rubber or other resilient material designed to be inflated with compressed air to support the load thereon;(((30)))(31) "Population center" includes incorporated cities and towns, including their urban growth areas, and census-designated places;(((31)))(32) "Private road or driveway." Every way or place in private ownership and used for travel of vehicles by the owner or those having express or implied permission from the owner, but not by other persons;(((32)))(33) "Railroad." A carrier of persons or property upon vehicles, other than streetcars, operated upon stationary rails, the route of which is principally outside incorporated cities and towns;(((33)))(34) "Railroad sign or signal." Any sign, signal, or device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the approach of a railroad train;(((34)))(35) "Residence district." The territory contiguous to and including the highway, as herein defined, not comprising a business district, as herein defined, when the property on such highway for a continuous distance of 300 feet or more on either side thereof is in the main improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business;(((35)))(36) "Roadway." The paved, improved, or proper driving portion of a highway designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel;(((36)))(37) "Safe system approach" means an internationally recognized holistic and proactive approach to road safety intended to systematically reduce fatal and serious injury crash potential; as described by the federal highway administration, the approach is based on the following elements: Safe roads, safe speeds, safe vehicles, safe road users, and postcrash care. The safe system approach is incorporated through policies and practices of state agencies and local governments with appropriate jurisdiction;(((37)))(38) "Safety zone." The area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and which is protected or is marked or indicated by painted marks, signs, buttons, standards, or otherwise so as to be plainly discernible;(((38)))(39) "Shared-use path," also known as a "multiuse path," means a facility designed for active transportation use and physically separated from motorized vehicular traffic within the highway right-of-way or on an exclusive right-of-way with minimal crossflow by motor vehicles. Shared-use paths are primarily used by pedestrians and people using bicycles or micromobility devices, including those who use nonmotorized or motorized wheeled mobility or assistive devices. With appropriate design considerations, equestrians may also be accommodated by a shared-use path facility;(((39)))(40) "Sidewalk." That property between the curb lines or the lateral lines of a roadway, as herein defined, and the adjacent property, set aside and intended for the use of pedestrians or such portion of private property parallel and in proximity to a highway and dedicated to use by pedestrians;(((40)))(41) "Solid tire." Every tire of rubber or other resilient material which does not depend upon inflation with compressed air for the support of the load thereon;(((41)))(42) "State highway." Every highway as herein defined, or part thereof, which has been designated as a state highway, or branch thereof, by legislative enactment;(((42)))(43) "Streetcar." A vehicle other than a train, as herein defined, for the transporting of persons or property and operated upon stationary rails principally within incorporated cities and towns;(((43)))(44) "Structurally deficient." A state bridge that is classified as in poor condition under the state bridge condition rating system and is reported by the state to the national bridge inventory as having a deck, superstructure, or substructure rating of four or below. Structurally deficient bridges are characterized by deteriorated conditions of significant bridge elements and potentially reduced load carrying capacity. Bridges deemed structurally deficient typically require significant maintenance and repair to remain in service, and require major rehabilitation or replacement to address the underlying deficiency;(((44)))(45) "Traffic." Pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, vehicles, streetcars, and other conveyances either singly or together while using any highways for purposes of travel;(((45)))(46) "Traffic control signal." Any traffic device, as herein defined, whether manually, electrically, or mechanically operated, by which traffic alternately is directed to stop or proceed or otherwise controlled;(((46)))(47) "Traffic devices." All signs, signals, markings, and devices not inconsistent with this title placed or erected by authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction, for the purpose of regulating, warning, or guiding traffic;(((47)))(48) "Train." A vehicle propelled by steam, electricity, or other motive power with or without cars coupled thereto, operated upon stationary rails, except streetcars;(((48)))(49) "Vehicle." Every device capable of being moved upon a highway and in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a highway, excepting power wheelchairs, as defined in RCW 46.04.415, or devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.Words and phrases used herein in the past, present, or future tense shall include the past, present, and future tenses; words and phrases used herein in the masculine, feminine, or neuter gender shall include the masculine, feminine, and neuter genders; and words and phrases used herein in the singular or plural shall include the singular and plural; unless the context thereof shall indicate to the contrary.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 502. A new section is added to chapter 47.44 RCW to read as follows:This chapter does not apply to leases issued for the deployment of clean energy facilities as provided in section 503 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 503. A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department shall establish a process for issuing a lease for the use of the right-of-way by a clean energy facility developer. Consistent with federal highway administration approval, the lease must include the right of direct ingress and egress from the highway for construction and maintenance of the clean energy facility during nonpeak hours if public safety is not adversely affected. Direct ingress and egress may be allowed at any time for the construction of the facility if public safety is not adversely affected and if construction will not substantially interfere with traffic flow during peak traffic periods. The lease may specify an indirect ingress and egress to the facility if it is reasonable and available for the particular location.(2) The cost of the lease must be limited to the fair market value of the portion of the right-of-way being used by the clean energy facility developer and the direct administrative expenses incurred by the department in processing the lease application.If the department and the clean energy facility developer are unable to agree on the cost of the lease, the clean energy facility developer may submit the cost of the lease to binding arbitration by serving written notice on the department. Within 30 days of receiving the notice, each party shall furnish a list of acceptable arbitrators. The parties shall select an arbitrator; failing to agree on an arbitrator, each party shall select one arbitrator and the two arbitrators shall select a third arbitrator for an arbitration panel. The arbitrator or panel shall determine the cost of the lease based on comparable siting agreements. Costs of the arbitration, including compensation for the arbitrator's services, must be borne equally by the parties participating in the arbitration and each party shall bear its own costs and expenses, including legal fees and witness expenses, in connection with the arbitration proceeding.(3) The department shall act on an application for a lease within 60 days of receiving a completed application, unless a clean energy facility developer consents to a different time period.(4) The reasons for a denial of a lease application must be supported by substantial evidence contained in a written record.(5) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.(6) All lease money paid to the department under this section shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.(7) This section does not apply when a clean energy facility is procured for delivery under chapter 47.47 RCW or when the clean energy facility developer is the department or contracted by the department.(8) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Right-of-way" means all state-owned land within a state highway corridor and any other land under the jurisdiction of the department.(b) "Clean energy facility developer" means every corporation, company, association, joint stock association, firm, partnership, or person that constructs, owns, operates, or manages any clean energy facility. "Clean energy facility developer" includes a service provider's contractors, subcontractors, and legal successors.Sec. 504. RCW 70A.65.240 and 2022 c 182 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The carbon emissions reduction account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account are intended to affect reductions in transportation sector carbon emissions through a variety of carbon reducing investments. These can include, but are not limited to: Transportation alternatives to single occupancy passenger vehicles; reductions in single occupancy passenger vehicle miles traveled; reductions in per mile emissions in vehicles, including through the funding of alternative fuel infrastructure and incentive programs; and emission reduction programs for freight transportation, including motor vehicles and rail, as well as for ferries and other maritime and port activities. Expenditures from the account may only be made for transportation carbon emission reducing purposes and may not be made for highway purposes authorized under the 18th Amendment of the Washington state Constitution, other than specified in this section, and shall be made in accordance with subsection (2) of this section. It is the legislature's intent that expenditures from the account used to reduce carbon emissions be made with the goal of achieving equity for communities that historically have been omitted or adversely impacted by past transportation policies and practices.(2) Appropriations in an omnibus transportation appropriations act from the carbon emissions reduction account shall be made exclusively to fund the following activities:(a) Active transportation;(b) Transit programs and projects;(c) Alternative fuel and electrification;(d) Clean energy facilities located in or on right-of-way or property under the jurisdiction of the department of transportation;(e) Ferries; and(((e)))(f) Rail.Sec. 505. RCW 47.47.020 and 2025 c 417 s 1202 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Commission" means the transportation commission.(2) "Department" means the department of transportation.(3) "Eligible transportation project" means any project that is not a rail project and meets the criteria to be evaluated for delivery in RCW 47.47.060, whether capital or operating, where the state's purpose for the project is to preserve or facilitate the safe transport of people or goods via any mode of travel or to establish, operate, or maintain a clean energy facility in or on right-of-way or property under the jurisdiction of the department.(4) "Private sector partner" and "private partner" means a person, entity, or organization that is not the federal government, a state, or a political subdivision of a state.(5) "Public funds" means all moneys derived from taxes, fees, charges, tolls, or other levies of money from the public.(6) "Public sector partner" and "public partner" means any federal or state unit of government, bistate transportation organization, or any other political subdivision of any state.(7) "State finance committee" means the entity created in chapter 43.33 RCW.(8) "Unit of government" means any department or agency of the federal government, any state or agency, office, or department of a state, any city, county, district, commission, authority, entity, port, or other public corporation organized and existing under statutory law or under a voter-approved charter or initiative, and any intergovernmental entity created under chapter 39.34 RCW or this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 506. The process for issuing leases required in section 503 of this act must be established by July 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 507. The department of transportation shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the implementation of the lease process by December 1, 2026. The department must submit this report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.PART VI: OLDER DRIVERSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 601. A new section is added to chapter 43.59 RCW to read as follows:Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington traffic safety commission, in consultation with the department of licensing, must create an older driver traffic safety awareness program that consists of, but is not limited to, the following:(1) A public education campaign that produces and disseminates through all possible media informational and educational materials explaining how aging can affect driving;(2) A comprehensive website that includes, but is not limited to:(a) Informational resources on aging and driving;(b) Guidance for family and caregivers, including warning signs, with concerns about older drivers;(c) Access to an online self-assessment tool for older drivers; and(d) Information on when and how to report a medically at-risk driver and how to get around without a vehicle; and(3) A designated older driver safety awareness week highlighting resources for older road users, including tips, tools, and any additional guidance to assist older drivers.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 602. A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:(1) By January 1, 2028, the department, after consulting with the appropriate organizations, shall create and implement an older driver reduced fee identicard program.(2) The fee for the identicard is $5 regardless of issuance time period.(3) Older drivers eligible for the program are currently licensed drivers aged 70 years or older who agree to voluntarily replace their driver's license with an identicard, provided the individual:(a) Meets the department criteria under RCW 46.20.117;(b) Meets the department criteria under RCW 46.20.202, if the eligible older driver wishes to obtain an enhanced identicard; and(c) Is expected to reside in a location within Washington state.(4) The department is authorized to adopt rules necessary to implement the older driver reduced fee identicard program under this section.PART VII: TRAFFIC SAFETY CAMERA ENFORCEMENT AND REVENUESec. 701. RCW 46.63.075 and 2024 c 307 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In a traffic infraction case involving an infraction detected through the use of an automated traffic safety camera under RCW 46.63.220 through 46.63.260, detected through the use of a speed safety camera system under RCW 46.63.200, or detected through the use of an automated school bus safety camera under RCW 46.63.180, proof that the particular vehicle described in the notice of traffic infraction was in violation of any such provision of RCW 46.63.220 through 46.63.260 or RCW 46.63.200 and 46.63.180, together with proof that the person named in the notice of traffic infraction was at the time of the violation the registered owner of the vehicle, constitutes in evidence a prima facie presumption that the registered owner of the vehicle was the person in control of the vehicle at the point where, and for the time during which, the violation occurred.(2) ((This))The presumption under subsection (1) of this section may be overcome only if the registered owner states, under oath, in a written statement to the court or in testimony before the court that the vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen or in the care, custody, or control of some person other than the registered owner. For a second or subsequent infraction under subsection (1) of this section committed within one year of an initial infraction, the presumption may be overcome only if the registered owner:(a) Provides a copy of a filed police report to the court indicating that the vehicle was reported stolen at the time the violation occurred;(b) Provides evidence to the court that a report of sale was filed with the department pursuant to RCW 46.12.650 prior to the date and time of the violation; or(c) States, under oath, in testimony before the court the full name and current address of the person who was in the care, custody, or control of the vehicle at the time of the violation.Sec. 702. RCW 46.63.220 and 2025 c 417 s 906 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a), (b), or (c).(2) Any city or county may authorize the use of automated traffic safety cameras and must adopt an ordinance authorizing such use through its local legislative authority.(3) The local legislative authority must prepare an analysis of the locations within the jurisdiction where automated traffic safety cameras are proposed to be located before adding traffic safety cameras to a new location or relocating any existing camera to a new location within the jurisdiction. The analysis must include equity considerations including the impact of the camera placement on livability, accessibility, economics, education, and environmental health when identifying where to locate an automated traffic safety camera. The analysis must also show a demonstrated need for traffic cameras based on one or more of the following in the vicinity of the proposed camera location: Travel by vulnerable road users, evidence of vehicles speeding, rates of collision, reports showing near collisions, and anticipated or actual ineffectiveness or infeasibility of other mitigation measures.(4) Automated traffic safety cameras may not be used on an on-ramp to a limited access facility as defined in RCW 47.52.010.(5) A city may use automated traffic safety cameras to enforce traffic ordinances in this section on state highways that are also classified as city streets under chapter 47.24 RCW. A city government must notify the department of transportation when it installs an automated traffic safety camera to enforce traffic ordinances as authorized in this subsection.(6)(a) At a minimum, a local ordinance adopted pursuant to this section must contain the restrictions described in this section and provisions for public notice and signage. Cities and counties must also post such restrictions and other automated traffic safety camera policies on the city's or county's website. Cities and counties using automated traffic safety cameras before July 24, 2005, are subject to the restrictions described in this section, but are not required to adopt an authorizing ordinance.(b)(i) Cities and counties using automated traffic safety cameras must post an annual report on the city's or county's website of the number of traffic crashes that occurred at each location where an automated traffic safety camera is located, as well as the number of notices of infraction issued for each camera. Beginning January 1, 2026, the annual report must include the percentage of revenues received from fines issued from automated traffic safety camera infractions that were used to pay for the costs of the automated traffic safety camera program and must describe the uses of revenues that exceeded the costs of operation and administration of the automated traffic safety camera program by the city or county.(ii) The Washington traffic safety commission must provide an annual report to the transportation committees of the legislature, and post the report to its website for public access, beginning July 1, 2026, that includes aggregated information on the use of automated traffic safety cameras in the state that includes an assessment of the impact of their use, information required in city and county annual reports under (b)(i) of this subsection, and information on the number of automated traffic safety cameras in use by type and location, with an analysis of camera placement in the context of area demographics and household incomes. To the extent practicable, the commission must also provide in its annual report the number of traffic accidents, speeding violations, single vehicle accidents, pedestrian accidents, and driving under the influence violations that occurred at each location where an automated traffic safety camera is located in the five years before each camera's authorization and after each camera's authorization. Cities and counties using automated traffic safety cameras must provide the commission with the data it requests for the report required under this subsection in a form and manner specified by the commission.(7) All locations where an automated traffic safety camera is used on roadways or intersections must be clearly marked by placing signs at least 30 days prior to activation of the camera in locations that clearly indicate to a driver either that: (a) The driver is within an area where automated traffic safety cameras are authorized; or (b) the driver is entering an area where violations are enforced by an automated traffic safety camera. The signs must be readily visible to a driver approaching an automated traffic safety camera. Signs placed in automated traffic safety camera locations after June 7, 2012, must follow the specifications and guidelines under the manual of uniform traffic control devices for streets and highways as adopted by the department of transportation under chapter 47.36 RCW. All public transportation vehicles utilizing a vehicle-mounted system must post a sign on the rear of the vehicle indicating to drivers that the vehicle is equipped with an automated traffic safety camera to enforce bus stop zone violations and public transportation only lane violations.(8) Automated traffic safety cameras may only record images of the vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is occurring. The image must not reveal the face of the driver or of passengers in the vehicle. The primary purpose of camera placement is to record images of the vehicle and vehicle license plate when an infraction is occurring. Cities and counties must consider installing automated traffic safety cameras in a manner that minimizes the impact of camera flash on drivers.(9) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle within 14 days of the violation, or to the renter of a vehicle within 14 days of establishing the renter's name and address under subsection (17) of this section. The notice of infraction must include with it a certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images produced by an automated traffic safety camera, stating the facts supporting the notice of infraction. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding charging a violation under this chapter. The photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images evidencing the violation must be available for inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the infraction. A person receiving a notice of infraction based on evidence detected by an automated traffic safety camera may respond to the notice by mail.(10) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for an infraction under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) unless the registered owner overcomes the presumption in RCW 46.63.075, or, in the case of a rental car business, satisfies the conditions under subsection (17) of this section. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter identified under subsection (17)(a) of this section is responsible for an infraction.(11) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images, or any other personally identifying data prepared under this section are for the exclusive use of authorized city or county employees, as specified in RCW 46.63.030(1)(d), in the discharge of duties under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding relates to a violation under this section. No photograph, microphotograph, or electronic image, or any other personally identifying data may be used for any purpose other than enforcement of violations under this section nor retained longer than necessary to enforce this section. Transit authorities must provide to the appropriate local jurisdiction that has authorized traffic safety camera use under RCW 46.63.260(3) any images or evidence collected establishing that a violation of stopping, standing, or parking in a bus stop zone or traveling, stopping, standing, or parking in a public transportation only lane has occurred for infraction processing purposes consistent with this section.(12) If a county or city has established an automated traffic safety camera program as authorized under this section, the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the system and may not be based upon a portion of the fine or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment. If the contract between the city or county and manufacturer or vendor of the equipment does not provide for performance or quality control measures regarding camera images, the city or county must perform a performance audit of the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment every three years to review and ensure that images produced from automated traffic safety cameras are sufficient for evidentiary purposes as described in subsection (9) of this section.(13)(a) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, a county or a city may only use revenue generated by an automated traffic safety camera program as authorized under this section for:(i) Traffic safety activities related to construction and preservation projects and maintenance and operations purposes including, but not limited to, projects designed to implement the complete streets approach as defined in RCW 47.04.010, changes in physical infrastructure to reduce speeds through road design, and changes to improve safety for active transportation users, including improvements to access and safety for road users with mobility, sight, or other disabilities; and(ii) The cost to administer, install, operate, and maintain the automated traffic safety cameras, including the cost of processing infractions.(b) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection:(i) The automated traffic safety camera program revenue used by a county or city with a population of 10,000 or more for purposes described in (a)(i) of this subsection must include the use of revenue in census tracts of the city or county that have household incomes in the lowest quartile determined by the most currently available census data and areas that experience rates of injury crashes that are above average for the city or county. Funding contributed from traffic safety program revenue must be, at a minimum, proportionate to the share of the population of the county or city who are residents of these low-income communities and communities experiencing high injury crash rates. This share must be directed to investments that provide direct and meaningful traffic safety benefits to these communities. Revenue used to administer, install, operate, and maintain automated traffic safety cameras, including the cost of processing infractions, are excluded from determination of the proportionate share of revenues under this subsection (13)(b); and(ii) The automated traffic safety camera program revenue used by a city or county with a population under 10,000 for traffic safety activities under (a)(i) of this subsection must be informed by the department of health's environmental health disparities map.(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, beginning ((four years after an automated traffic safety camera authorized under this section is initially placed and in use after June 6, 2024, 25))July 1, 2028, 10 percent of the noninterest money received for infractions issued by ((such cameras in excess of the cost to administer, install, operate, and maintain the cameras, including the cost of processing infractions,))automated traffic safety cameras authorized under this section must be deposited into the Cooper Jones active transportation safety account created in RCW 46.68.480.(d)(i)(A) Jurisdictions with an automated traffic safety camera program in effect before January 1, 2024, may continue to allocate revenue generated from automated traffic safety cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.230 and 46.63.250(2)(c) as determined by the jurisdiction, as well as for the purposes established in (a) through (c) of this subsection, by:(I) Up to a 10 percent increase in the number of traffic safety camera locations authorized to detect violations for automated traffic safety cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.230; and(II) Up to a 10 percent increase in the number of traffic safety camera locations authorized to detect violations for automated traffic safety cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.250(2)(c).(B)(I) Any automated traffic safety camera program in effect before January 1, 2024, with fewer than 10 traffic safety camera locations for automated traffic safety cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.230, which adds automated traffic safety cameras to one additional location for the use of cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.230, may continue to allocate revenue generated from automated traffic safety cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.230 as determined by the jurisdiction, as well as for the purposes established in (a) through (c) of this subsection.(II) Any automated traffic safety camera program in effect before January 1, 2024, with fewer than 10 traffic safety camera locations for automated traffic safety cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.250(2)(c) as of January 1, 2024, which adds automated traffic safety cameras to one additional location for the use of cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.250(2)(c), may continue to allocate revenue generated from automated traffic safety cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.250(2)(c) as determined by the jurisdiction, as well as for the purposes established in (a) through (c) of this subsection.(C) For the purposes of this subsection (13)(d)(i), a location is:(I) An intersection for automated traffic safety cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.230 where cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.230 are in use; and(II) A school speed zone for automated traffic safety cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.250(2)(c) where cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.250(2)(c) are in use.(ii) The revenue distribution requirements under (a) through (d)(i) of this subsection do not apply to automated traffic safety camera programs in effect before January 1, 2024, for which an ordinance in effect as of January 1, 2024, directs the manner in which revenue generated from automated traffic safety cameras authorized under RCW 46.63.230 or 46.63.250(2)(c) must be used.(14) A county or city may adopt the use of an online ability-to-pay calculator to process and grant requests for reduced fines or reduced civil penalties for automated traffic safety camera violations.(15) Except as provided in this subsection, registered owners of vehicles who receive notices of infraction for automated traffic safety camera-enforced infractions and are recipients of public assistance under Title 74 RCW or participants in the Washington women, infants, and children program, and who request reduced penalties for infractions detected through the use of automated traffic safety camera violations, must be granted reduced penalty amounts of 50 percent of what would otherwise be assessed for a first automated traffic safety camera violation and for subsequent automated traffic safety camera violations issued within 21 days of issuance of the first automated traffic safety camera violation. Eligibility for medicaid under RCW 74.09.510 is not a qualifying criterion under this subsection. Registered owners of vehicles who receive notices of infraction must be provided with information on their eligibility and the opportunity to apply for a reduction in penalty amounts through the mail or internet.(16) Infractions detected through the use of automated traffic safety cameras are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated by the use of automated traffic safety cameras under this section must be processed in the same manner as parking infractions, including for the purposes of RCW 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16A.120, and 46.20.270(2). The amount of the fine issued for an infraction generated through the use of an automated traffic safety camera may not exceed $145, as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five years, beginning January 1, 2029, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period, but may be doubled for a school speed zone infraction generated through the use of an automated traffic safety camera.(17) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business, the issuing agency must, before a notice of infraction being issued under this section, provide a written notice to the rental car business that a notice of infraction may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within 18 days of receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing agency by return mail:(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the infraction occurred; or(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction. A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car business may pay the applicable penalty. Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this chapter for the notice of infraction.PART VIII: REMOVAL OF EXPIRED ALTERNATIVE FUEL VEHICLE TAX INCENTIVE REPORTING REQUIREMENTSec. 801. RCW 82.08.9999 and 2022 c 182 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Beginning August 1, 2019, with sales made or lease agreements signed on or after the qualification period start date:(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply as provided in (b) of this subsection to sales or leases of new or used passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles that:(i) Are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel; or(ii) Use at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and are capable of traveling at least 30 miles using only battery power; and(iii)(A) Have a vehicle selling price plus trade-in property of like kind for purchased vehicles that:(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $45,000; or(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $30,000; or(B) Have a fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles that:(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $45,000; or(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $30,000;(b)(i) The exemption in this section is applicable for up to the amounts specified in (b)(ii) or (iii) of this subsection of:(A) The total amount of the vehicle's selling price, for sales made; or(B) The total lease payments made plus any additional selling price of the leased vehicle if the original lessee purchases the leased vehicle before the qualification period end date, for lease agreements signed.(ii) Based on the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed of the vehicle if the vehicle is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed:(A) From the qualification period start date until July 31, 2021, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $25,000;(B) From August 1, 2021, until July 31, 2023, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $20,000;(C) From August 1, 2023, until July 31, 2025, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $15,000.(iii) If the vehicle is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $16,000.(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. A person claiming the exemption must also submit itemized information to the department for all vehicles for which an exemption is claimed that must include the following: Vehicle make; vehicle model; model year; whether the vehicle has been sold or leased; date of sale or start date of lease; length of lease; sales price for purchased vehicles and fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles; and the total amount qualifying for the incentive claimed for each vehicle, in addition to the future monthly amount to be claimed for each leased vehicle. This information must be provided in a form and manner prescribed by the department.(3)(a) The department of licensing must maintain and publish a list of all vehicle models qualifying for the tax exemptions under this section or RCW 82.12.9999 until the expiration date of this section, and is authorized to issue final rulings on vehicle model qualification for these criteria. A seller is not responsible for repayment of the tax exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999 for a vehicle if the department of licensing's published list of qualifying vehicle models on the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed includes the vehicle model and the department of licensing subsequently removes the vehicle model from the published list, and, if applicable, the vehicle meets the qualifying criterion under subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B) of this section and RCW 82.12.9999(1)(a)(iii)(B).(b) The department of revenue retains responsibility for determining whether a vehicle meets the applicable qualifying criterion under subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B) of this section and RCW 82.12.9999(1)(a)(iii)(B).(4) By the last day of October 2019, and every six months thereafter until ((this section expires))October 31, 2025, based on the best available data, the department must report the following information to the transportation committees of the legislature: The cumulative number of vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999 by month of purchase or lease start and vehicle make and model; the dollar amount of all state retail sales and use taxes exempted on or after the qualification period start date, under this section and RCW 82.12.9999; and estimates of the future costs of leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999.(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Clean alternative fuel" means natural gas, propane, hydrogen, or electricity, when used as a fuel in a motor vehicle that meets the California motor vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, effective January 1, 2019, and the rules of the Washington state department of ecology.(b) "Fair market value" has the same meaning as "value of the article used" in RCW 82.12.010.(c) "New vehicle" has the same meaning as "new motor vehicle" in RCW 46.04.358.(d) "Qualification period end date" means August 1, 2025.(e) "Qualification period start date" means August 1, 2019.(f) "Used vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.660.(6)(a) Sales of vehicles delivered to the buyer or leased vehicles for which the lease agreement was signed after the qualification period end date do not qualify for the exemption under this section.(b) All leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section before the qualification period end date must continue to receive the exemption as described under subsection (1)(b) of this section on any lease payments due through the remainder of the lease before August 1, 2028.(7) This section expires August 1, 2028.(8) This section is supported by the revenues generated in RCW 46.17.324, and therefore takes effect only if RCW 46.17.324 is enacted by June 30, 2019.PART IX: RENAMING CERTAIN ELECTRIC VEHICLE FEES AS "FIX OUR ROADS" FEESSec. 901. RCW 46.17.323 and 2022 c 149 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Before accepting an application for an annual vehicle registration renewal for a vehicle that both (a) uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and (b) is capable of traveling at least 30 miles using only battery power, except for electric motorcycles, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require the applicant to pay a $100 "fix our roads" (2012) electric vehicle fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. The $100 fee is due only at the time of annual registration renewal.(2) This section only applies to a vehicle that is designed to have the capability to drive at a speed of more than 35 miles per hour.(3)(a) The fee under this section is imposed to provide funds to mitigate the impact of vehicles on state roads and highways and for the purpose of evaluating the feasibility of transitioning from a revenue collection system based on fuel taxes to a road user assessment system, and is separate and distinct from other vehicle license fees. Proceeds from the fee must be used for highway purposes, and must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070, subject to (b) of this subsection.(b) If in any year the amount of proceeds from the fee collected under this section exceeds $1,000,000, the excess amount over $1,000,000 must be deposited as follows:(i) Seventy percent to the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070;(ii) Fifteen percent to the transportation improvement account created in RCW 47.26.084; and(iii) Fifteen percent to the rural arterial trust account created in RCW 36.79.020.(4)(a) In addition to the fee established in subsection (1) of this section, before accepting an application for an annual vehicle registration renewal for a vehicle that both (i) uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and (ii) is capable of traveling at least 30 miles using only battery power, except for electric motorcycles, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require the applicant to pay a $50 "fix our roads" (2015) electric vehicle fee.(b) The fee required under (a) of this subsection must be distributed as follows:(i) The first $1,000,000 raised by the fee must be deposited into the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070; and(ii) Any remaining amounts must be deposited into the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.(5) Beginning November 1, 2022, before accepting an application for an annual vehicle registration renewal for an electric motorcycle that uses propulsion units powered solely by electricity, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require the applicant to pay a $30 "fix our roads" electric motorcycle fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. The $30 fee is due only at the time of annual registration renewal.(6) The fees collected pursuant to subsection (5) of this section shall be deposited into the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.(7) This section applies to annual vehicle registration renewals until the effective date of enacted legislation that imposes a vehicle miles traveled fee or tax.Sec. 902. RCW 46.17.324 and 2019 c 287 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:((To realize the environmental benefits of electrification of the transportation system it is necessary to support the adoption of electric vehicles and other electric technology in the state by incentivizing the purchase of these vehicles, building out the charging infrastructure, developing greener transit options, and supporting clean alternative fuel infrastructure. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to support these activities through the imposition of new transportation electrification fees in this section.))(1) A vehicle that both (a) uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and (b) is capable of traveling at least ((thirty))30 miles using only battery power, is subject to an annual ((seventy-five dollar transportation electrification))$75 "fix our roads" (2019) electric vehicle fee to be collected by the department, county auditor, or other agent or subagent appointed by the director, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. For administrative efficiencies, the transportation electrification fee must be collected at the same time as vehicle registration renewals and may only be collected for vehicles that are renewing an annual vehicle registration.(2) Beginning October 1, 2019, in lieu of the fee in subsection (1) of this section for a hybrid or alternative fuel vehicle that is not required to pay the fees established in RCW 46.17.323 (1) and (4), the department, county auditor, or other agent or subagent appointed by the director must require that the applicant for the annual vehicle registration renewal of such hybrid or alternative fuel vehicle pay a ((seventy-five dollar))$75 "fix our roads" hybrid vehicle ((transportation electrification)) fee, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.(3) The fees required under this section must be deposited in the electric vehicle account created in RCW 82.44.200, until July 1, 2025, when the fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle ((account [fund]))fund.(4) This section only applies to a vehicle that is designed to have the capability to drive at a speed of more than ((thirty-five))35 miles per hour.PART X: ACCOUNT INTEREST EARNINGSSec. 1001. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 802, 2025 c 399 s 15, 2025 c 359 s 12, and 2025 c 299 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project toll facility bond retirement account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the medicaid access program account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the Sandy Williams connecting communities program account, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide school-based bicycle education grant program account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 1002. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 802, 2025 c 399 s 15, and 2025 c 299 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project toll facility bond retirement account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the Sandy Williams connecting communities program account, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide school-based bicycle education grant program account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 1003. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, 2025 c 359 s 13, and 2025 c 299 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project toll facility bond retirement account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the medicaid access program account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the Sandy Williams connecting communities program account, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide school-based bicycle education grant program account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 1004. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, and 2025 c 299 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project toll facility bond retirement account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the Sandy Williams connecting communities program account, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide school-based bicycle education grant program account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 1005. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, 2025 c 359 s 13, 2025 c 299 s 22, and 2025 c 228 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the intelligent speed assistance device revolving account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project toll facility bond retirement account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the medicaid access program account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the Sandy Williams connecting communities program account, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide school-based bicycle education grant program account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 1006. RCW 43.84.092 and 2025 c 417 s 803, 2025 c 399 s 16, 2025 c 299 s 22, and 2025 c 228 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the driver education safety improvement account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the intelligent speed assistance device revolving account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project toll facility bond retirement account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the Sandy Williams connecting communities program account, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide school-based bicycle education grant program account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.PART XI: TOLL COLLECTIONSec. 1101. RCW 46.63.160 and 2015 c 292 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) This section applies only to civil penalties for nonpayment of tolls detected through use of photo toll systems.(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a), (b), or (c).(3) A notice of civil penalty may be issued by the department of transportation when a toll is assessed through use of a photo toll system and the toll is not paid by the toll payment due date, which is ((eighty))80 days from the date the vehicle uses the toll facility and incurs the toll charge.(4) Any registered owner or renter of a vehicle traveling upon a toll facility operated under chapter 47.56 or 47.46 RCW is subject to a civil penalty governed by the administrative procedures set forth in this section when the vehicle incurs a toll charge and the toll is not paid by the toll payment due date, which is ((eighty))80 days from the date the vehicle uses the toll facility and incurs the toll charge.(5)(a) The department shall develop rules to allow an individual who has been issued a notice of civil penalty to present evidence of mitigating circumstances as to why a toll bill was not timely paid. If an individual is able to present verifiable evidence to the department that a civil penalty was incurred due to hospitalization, military deployment, eviction, homelessness, death of the alleged violator or of an alleged violator's immediate family member, failure to receive the toll bill due to an incorrect email or physical address that has since been corrected, a prepaid electronic toll account error that has since been corrected, an error made by the department or an agent of the department, or other mitigating circumstances as determined by the department, the department may dismiss or reduce the civil penalty and associated fees.(b)(i) Consistent with chapter 34.05 RCW, the department of transportation shall develop an administrative adjudication process to review appeals of civil penalties issued by the department of transportation for toll nonpayment detected through the use of a photo toll system under this section. The department of transportation shall submit to the transportation committees of the legislature an annual report on the number of times adjudicators reduce or dismiss the civil penalty as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection and the total amount of the civil penalties dismissed. The report must be submitted by December 1st of each year.(ii) During the adjudication process, the alleged violator must have an opportunity to explain mitigating circumstances as to why the toll bill was not timely paid. Hospitalization, a divorce decree or legal separation agreement resulting in a transfer of the vehicle, an active duty member of the military or national guard covered by the federal service members civil relief act, 50 U.S.C. Sec. 501 et seq., or state service members' civil relief act, chapter 38.42 RCW, eviction, homelessness, the death of the alleged violator or of an immediate family member, being switched to a different method of toll payment, if the alleged violator did not receive a toll charge bill or notice of civil penalty, or other mitigating circumstances as determined by the adjudicator are deemed valid mitigating circumstances. All of the reasons that constitute mitigating circumstances must have occurred within a reasonable time of the alleged toll violation. In response to these circumstances, the adjudicator may reduce or dismiss the civil penalty and associated administrative fees.(6) The use of a photo toll system is subject to the following requirements:(a) Photo toll systems may take photographs, digital photographs, microphotographs, videotapes, or other recorded images of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only.(b) A notice of civil penalty must include with it a certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded images produced by a photo toll system, stating the facts supporting the notice of civil penalty. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding established under subsection (5) of this section. The photographs, digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded images evidencing the toll nonpayment civil penalty must be available for inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the civil penalty.(c)(i) By June 30, 2016, prior to issuing a notice of civil penalty to a registered owner of a vehicle listed on an active prepaid electronic toll account, the department of transportation must:(A) Send an ((electronic mail))email notice to the email address provided in the prepaid electronic toll account of unpaid pay-by-mail toll bills at least ((ten))10 days prior to a notice of civil penalty being issued for the associated pay-by-mail toll. The notice must be separate from any regular notice sent by the department; and(B) Call the phone numbers provided in the account to provide notice of unpaid pay-by-mail toll bills at least ((ten))10 days prior to a notice of civil penalty being issued for the associated pay-by-mail toll.(ii) The department is relieved of its obligation to provide notice as required by this section if the customer has declined to receive communications from the department through such methods.(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, other recorded images, or other records identifying a specific instance of travel prepared under this section are for the exclusive use of the tolling agency for toll collection and enforcement purposes and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding relates to a civil penalty under this section. No photograph, digital photograph, microphotograph, videotape, other recorded image, or other record identifying a specific instance of travel may be used for any purpose other than toll collection or enforcement of civil penalties under this section. Records identifying a specific instance of travel by a specific person or vehicle must be retained only as required to ensure payment and enforcement of tolls and to comply with state records retention policies.(e) All locations where a photo toll system is used must be clearly marked by placing signs in locations that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where tolls are assessed and enforced by a photo toll system.(f) Within existing resources, the department of transportation shall conduct education and outreach efforts at least six months prior to activating an all-electronic photo toll system. Methods of outreach shall include a department presence at community meetings in the vicinity of a toll facility, signage, and information published in local media. Information provided shall include notice of when all electronic photo tolling shall begin and methods of payment. Additionally, the department shall provide quarterly reporting on education and outreach efforts and other data related to the issuance of civil penalties.(g) The envelope or electronic message containing a toll charge bill or related notice issued pursuant to RCW 47.46.105 or 47.56.795, or a notice of civil penalty issued under this section, must prominently indicate that the contents are time sensitive and related to a toll violation.(7) Civil penalties for toll nonpayment detected through the use of photo toll systems must be issued to the registered owner of the vehicle identified by the photo toll system, but are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120.(8) The civil penalty for toll nonpayment detected through the use of a photo toll system is ((forty dollars))$40 plus the photo toll and associated fees.(9) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, all civil penalties, including the photo toll and associated fees, collected under this section must be deposited into the toll facility account of the facility on which the toll was assessed. However, through June 30, 2013, civil penalties deposited into the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account created under RCW 47.56.165 that are in excess of amounts necessary to support the toll adjudication process applicable to toll collection on the Tacoma Narrows bridge must first be allocated toward repayment of operating loans and reserve payments provided to the account from the motor vehicle ((account [fund]))fund under section 1005(15), chapter 518, Laws of 2007. Additionally, all civil penalties, resulting from nonpayment of tolls on the state route number 520 corridor, shall be deposited into the state route number 520 civil penalties account created under section 4, chapter 248, Laws of 2010 but only if chapter 248, Laws of 2010 is enacted by June 30, 2010.(10) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business, the department of transportation shall, before a toll bill is issued, provide a written notice to the rental car business that a toll bill may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within ((thirty))30 days of the mailing of the written notice, provide to the issuing agency by return mail:(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the toll was assessed; or(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the toll was assessed because the vehicle was stolen at the time the toll was assessed. A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car business may pay the applicable toll and fee.Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this section for the payment of the toll.(11) It is the intent of the legislature that the department provide an educational opportunity when vehicle owners incur fees and penalties associated with late payment of tolls for the first time. As part of this educational opportunity, the department may waive penalties and fees if the issue that resulted in the toll not being timely paid has been resolved and the vehicle owner establishes an electronic toll account, if practicable. To aid in collecting tolls in a timely manner, the department may waive or reduce the outstanding amounts of fees and penalties assessed when tolls are not timely paid.(12)(a) By June 30, 2016, the department of transportation must update its website, and accommodate access to the website from mobile platforms, to allow toll customers to efficiently manage all their tolling accounts, regardless of method of payment.(b)(i) By June 30, 2016, the department of transportation must make available to the public a point of access that allows a third party to develop an application for mobile technologies that (A) securely accesses a user's toll account information and (B) allows the user to manage his or her toll account to the same extent possible through the department's website.(ii) If the department determines that it would be cost-effective and in the best interests of the citizens of Washington, it may also develop an application for mobile technologies that allows toll customers to manage all of their tolling accounts from a mobile platform.(13) When acquiring a new photo toll system, the department of transportation must enable the new system to:(a) Connect with the department of licensing's vehicle record system so that a prepaid electronic toll account can be updated automatically when a toll customer's vehicle record is updated, if the customer has consented to such updates; and(b) Document when any toll is assessed for a vehicle listed in a prepaid electronic toll account in the monthly statement that is made available to the electronic toll account holder regardless of whether the method of payment for the toll is via pay-by-mail or prepaid electronic toll account.(14) Consistent with chapter 34.05 RCW, the department of transportation shall develop rules to implement this section.(15) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Photo toll system" means the system defined in RCW 47.56.010 and 47.46.020.(b) "Prepaid electronic toll account" means a prepaid toll account linked to a pass or license plate number, including "Good to Go!".(16) If a customer's toll charge or civil penalty is waived pursuant to this section due to an error made by the department, or an agent of the department, in reading the customer's license plate, the secretary of transportation must send a letter to the customer apologizing for the error.PART XII: SALES TAX PROVISIONSSec. 1201. RCW 82.08.020 and 2025 c 418 s 3 and 2025 c 417 s 201 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state of:(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services, if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale.(2)(a) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to:(i) Eleven and nine-tenths percent of the selling price from January 1, 2026, through December 31, 2026; and(ii)(A) Nine and nine-tenths percent of the selling price beginning January 1, 2027.(B) The revenue collected under (a) of this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(b)(((i))) Beginning January 1, 2027, there is levied and collected an additional tax on peer-to-peer car sharing transactions equal to the selling price multiplied by the rate of tax imposed under (a) of this subsection. This subsection (2)(b) applies only to peer-to-peer car sharing transactions where the vehicle owner obtained the shared vehicle as a vehicle for resale using a reseller permit or an approved exemption certificate under RCW 82.04.470. The vehicle owner must submit documentation in a form and manner prescribed by the department to the business facilitating peer-to-peer car sharing transactions indicating whether the shared vehicle owner paid state sales tax or use tax on the shared vehicle at the time the vehicle was obtained. Businesses facilitating peer-to-peer car sharing transactions must retain copies of this documentation for the period required in RCW 82.32.070. The revenue collected under this subsection (2)(b) must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(((ii)))(3) For purposes of this ((subsection (2)(b)))section, "peer-to-peer car sharing" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.74A.010. "Peer-to-peer car sharing" does not mean:(((A)))(a) "Retail car rental" as defined in RCW 82.08.011; or(((B)))(b) "Rental car" as defined in RCW 46.04.465 or 48.115.005.(((3)))(4) There is levied and collected an additional tax of five-tenths of one percent of the selling price on each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail car rentals and peer-to-peer car sharing transactions taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(((4)))(5)(a) Beginning July 1, 2026, in addition to taxes required under this chapter and chapters 82.12 and 82.49 RCW, there is levied and collected an additional tax of five-tenths of one percent on the selling price, plus trade-in property of like kind, for purchased recreational vessels.(b) In the case of a lease requiring periodic payments, the tax is imposed on the fair market value of the recreational vessel at the inception of the lease.(c) The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(d) For purposes of this subsection, "recreational vessel" means a vessel as defined in RCW 88.02.310 that is subject to watercraft excise tax under chapter 82.49 RCW.(((5)))(6) For purposes of subsection (((3)))(4) of this section, "motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include:(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181, unless the farm tractor or farm vehicle is for use in the production of cannabis;(b) Off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365;(c) Nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.310; and(d) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.(((6)))(7) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited in the performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.(((7)))(8) Beginning July 1, 2027, the portion of taxes collected by the state under subsection (1) of this section equal to 0.1 percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state must be deposited ((in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070))as follows: (a) 50 percent in the Puget Sound ferry operations account created in RCW 47.60.530; (b) 25 percent in the Puget Sound capital construction account created in RCW 47.60.505; and (c) 25 percent in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(((8)))(9) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to successive retail sales of the same property.(((9)))(10) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.Sec. 1202. RCW 82.12.020 and 2025 c 418 s 4 and 2025 c 417 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) There is levied and collected from every person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within this state as a consumer any:(a) Article of tangible personal property acquired by the user in any manner, including tangible personal property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including by-products used by the manufacturer thereof, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, irrespective of whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are available for purchase within this state;(b) Prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding prewritten computer software that is either provided free of charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing information, or both;(c) Services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((c)))(b), excluding services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b) that are provided free of charge;(d) Extended warranty; or(e)(i) Digital good, digital code, or digital automated service, including the use of any services provided by a seller exclusively in connection with digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.(ii) With respect to the use of digital goods, digital automated services, and digital codes acquired by purchase, the tax imposed in this subsection (1)(e) applies in respect to:(A) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;(B) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;(C) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and(D) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.(iii) With respect to digital goods, digital automated services, and digital codes acquired other than by purchase, the tax imposed in this subsection (1)(e) applies regardless of whether or not the consumer has a right of permanent use or is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of use.(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or service taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((c)))(b), if the sale to, or the use by, the present user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.(3)(a) Except as provided in this section, payment of the tax imposed by this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW by one purchaser or user of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or other service does not have the effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or other service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.(b) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply:(i) If the sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by his or her bailor or donor;(ii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid based on reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use;(iii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961; or(iv) To the use of digital goods or digital automated services, which were obtained through the use of a digital code, if the sale of the digital code to, or the use of the digital code by, the present user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (4), the tax is levied and must be collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used, value of the digital good or digital code used, value of the extended warranty used, or value of the service used by the taxpayer, multiplied by the applicable rates in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.(b) In the case of a seller required to collect use tax from the purchaser, the tax must be collected in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied by the applicable rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.(5) Beginning July 1, 2027, the portion of taxes collected by the state under subsection (1) of this section equal to 0.1 percent of the value of the article used, value of the digital good or digital code used, value of the extended warranty used, or value of the service used by the taxpayer, must be deposited ((in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070))as follows: (a) 50 percent in the Puget Sound ferry operations account created in RCW 47.60.530; (b) 25 percent in the Puget Sound capital construction account created in RCW 47.60.505; and (c) 25 percent in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(6) For purposes of the tax imposed in this section, "person" includes anyone within the definition of "buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" in RCW 82.08.010.(7)(a) Beginning July 1, 2026, the tax imposed in this section at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(((4)))(5) applies to the use of a recreational vessel at the time that it is first used in this state by the consumer.(b) The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(c) For purposes of this subsection, "recreational vessel" means a vessel as defined in RCW 88.02.310 that is subject to watercraft excise tax under chapter 82.49 RCW.PART XIII: FUEL TAX INFLATION DISTRIBUTION CLARIFICATIONSec. 1301. RCW 82.38.030 and 2025 c 417 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is levied and imposed upon fuel licensees a tax at the rate of 23 cents per gallon of fuel.(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative tax rate of five cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees. This subsection (2) expires when the bonds issued for transportation 2003 projects are retired.(3) Beginning July 1, 2005, an additional and cumulative tax rate of three cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(4) Beginning July 1, 2006, an additional and cumulative tax rate of three cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(5) Beginning July 1, 2007, an additional and cumulative tax rate of two cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(6) Beginning July 1, 2008, an additional and cumulative tax rate of one and one-half cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(7) Beginning August 1, 2015, an additional and cumulative tax rate of seven cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(8) Beginning July 1, 2016, an additional and cumulative tax rate of four and nine-tenths cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(9) Beginning July 1, 2025, an additional and cumulative tax rate of six cents per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(10) Beginning July 1, 2025, an additional and cumulative tax rate of three cents per gallon of special fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(11) Beginning July 1, 2027, an additional and cumulative tax rate of three cents per gallon of special fuel is imposed on fuel licensees.(12)(((a))) Beginning July 1, 2026, ((the fuel tax rates imposed under subsections (1) through (9) of this section must be increased annually by two percent and the resulting fuel tax rate must be rounded to the nearest one-thousandth of $1.(b)))an additional and cumulative tax rate per gallon of fuel is imposed on fuel licensees. The tax rate imposed under this subsection is calculated each July 1st by:(a) Increasing by two percent the sum of:(i) The fuel tax rates imposed under subsections (1) through (9) of this section as of the current July 1st; and(ii) The fuel tax rate imposed under this subsection (12) for the prior 12 months;(b) Subtracting the sum of the fuel tax rates imposed under subsections (1) through (9) of this section as of the current July 1st; and(c) Rounding the result to the nearest one-thousandth of $1.(13) Beginning July 1, 2028, ((the fuel tax rate imposed under subsections (10) and (11) of this section must be increased annually by two percent and the resulting fuel tax rate must be rounded to the nearest one-thousandth of $1.(13)))an additional and cumulative tax rate per gallon of special fuel is imposed on fuel licensees. The tax rate imposed under this subsection is calculated each July 1st by:(a) Increasing by two percent the sum of:(i) The fuel tax rates imposed under subsections (1) through (11) of this section as of the current July 1st; and(ii) The fuel tax rates imposed under subsection (12) of this section and this subsection (13) for the prior 12 months;(b) Subtracting the sum of the fuel tax rates imposed under subsections (1) through (12) of this section as of the current July 1st; and(c) Rounding the result to the nearest one-thousandth of $1.(14) Taxes are imposed when:(a) Fuel is removed in this state from a terminal if the fuel is removed at the rack unless the removal is by a licensed supplier or distributor for direct delivery to a destination outside of the state, or the removal is by a fuel supplier for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320;(b) Fuel is removed in this state from a refinery if either of the following applies:(i) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of the fuel immediately before the removal is not a licensed supplier; or(ii) The removal is at the refinery rack unless the removal is to a licensed supplier or distributor for direct delivery to a destination outside of the state, or the removal is to a licensed supplier for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320;(c) Fuel enters into this state for sale, consumption, use, or storage, unless the fuel enters this state for direct delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320, if either of the following applies:(i) The entry is by bulk transfer and the importer is not a licensed supplier; or(ii) The entry is not by bulk transfer;(d) Fuel enters this state by means outside the bulk transfer-terminal system and is delivered directly to a licensed terminal unless the owner is a licensed distributor or supplier;(e) Fuel is sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed entity unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the fuel;(f) Blended fuel is removed or sold in this state by the blender of the fuel. The number of gallons of blended fuel subject to tax is the difference between the total number of gallons of blended fuel removed or sold and the number of gallons of previously taxed fuel used to produce the blended fuel;(g) Dyed special fuel is used on a highway, as authorized by the internal revenue code, unless the use is exempt from the fuel tax;(h) Dyed special fuel is held for sale, sold, used, or is intended to be used in violation of this chapter;(i) Special fuel purchased by an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320 is used on a highway; and(j) Fuel is sold by a licensed fuel supplier to a fuel distributor or fuel blender and the fuel is not removed from the bulk transfer-terminal system.Sec. 1302. RCW 46.68.090 and 2025 c 417 s 103 and 2025 c 416 s 706 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the fuel tax must be first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this subsection. The remaining net tax amount must be distributed monthly by the state treasurer in accordance with subsections (2) through (9) of this section.(a) For payment of refunds of fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state of Washington in the administration of the fuel tax, which sums must be distributed monthly.(2) All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(1) must be distributed as set forth in (a) through (j) of this subsection.(a) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 44.387 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW 46.68.130;(b)(i) For distribution to the special category C account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to be expended for special category C projects. Special category C projects are category C projects that, due to high cost only, will require bond financing to complete construction.(ii) The following criteria, listed in order of priority, must be used in determining which special category C projects have the highest priority:(A) Accident experience;(B) Fatal accident experience;(C) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable speeds without undue congestion; and(D) Continuity of development of the highway transportation network.(iii) Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under this subsection (2)(b);(c) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;(d) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;(e) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;(f) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;(g) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;(h) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there must be distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW 47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW 46.68.120;(i) For distribution to the county arterial preservation account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565 percent. These funds must be distributed by the county road administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each county and must be used for improvements to sustain the structural, safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road administration board must adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management system is used. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the county arterial preservation account may also be used for staffing-related expenses of the board, contracting costs, and grants associated with bridge ratings;(j) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in accordance with RCW 36.79.020.(3) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(2) must be distributed to the transportation 2003 account (nickel account).(4) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(3) must be distributed as follows:(a) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;(b) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to counties of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and(c) The remainder must be distributed to the transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.(5) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030(4) must be distributed as follows:(a) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;(b) 8.3333 percent must be distributed to counties of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and(c) The remainder must be distributed to the transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.(6) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030 (5) and (6) must be distributed to the transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.(7) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030 (7) and (8) must be distributed to the connecting Washington account created in RCW 46.68.395.(8) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.38.030 (9) through (((12)))(13) must be distributed as follows:(a) Two and one-half percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;(b) Two and one-half percent must be distributed to counties of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and(c) The remainder must be distributed to the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.(9) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise taxes on fuel.PART XIV: TIRE FEE SELLER RETENTION AMOUNT CLARIFICATIONSec. 1401. RCW 70A.205.405 and 2025 c 417 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is levied a $5 per tire fee on the retail sale of new replacement vehicle tires. The fee imposed in this section must be paid by the buyer to the seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full amount of the fee. The fee collected from the buyer by the seller less the ((ten percent)) amount retained by the seller as provided in RCW 70A.205.430(1) must be paid to the department of revenue in accordance with RCW 82.32.045.(2) The department of revenue shall incorporate into the agency's regular audit cycle a reconciliation of the number of tires sold and the amount of revenue collected by the businesses selling new replacement vehicle tires at retail. The department of revenue shall collect on the business excise tax return from the businesses selling new replacement vehicle tires at retail:(a) The number of tires sold; and(b) The fee levied in this section.(3) All other applicable provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full force and application with respect to the fee imposed under this section. The department of revenue shall administer this section.(4) For the purposes of this section, "new replacement vehicle tires" means tires that are newly manufactured for vehicle purposes and does not include retreaded vehicle tires.PART XV: REPEAL OF LUXURY AIRCRAFT TAX, AIRCRAFT FUEL TAX INCREASE, AND OTHER AIRCRAFT PROVISIONSSec. 1501. RCW 82.32.145 and 2025 c 417 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Whenever the department has issued a warrant under RCW 82.32.210 for the collection of unpaid trust fund taxes from a limited liability business entity and that business entity has been terminated, dissolved, or abandoned, or is insolvent, the department may pursue collection of the entity's unpaid trust fund taxes, including penalties and interest on those taxes, against any or all of the responsible individuals. For purposes of this subsection, "insolvent" means the condition that results when the sum of the entity's debts exceeds the fair market value of its assets. The department may presume that an entity is insolvent if the entity refuses to disclose to the department the nature of its assets and liabilities.(2) Personal liability under this section may be imposed for state and local trust fund taxes.(3)(a) For a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer, liability under this section applies regardless of fault or whether the individual was or should have been aware of the unpaid trust fund tax liability of the limited liability business entity.(b) For any other responsible individual, liability under this section applies only if he or she willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid to the department the trust fund taxes due from the limited liability business entity.(4)(a) Except as provided in this subsection (4)(a), a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer is liable under this section only for trust fund tax liability accrued during the period that he or she was the chief executive or chief financial officer. However, if the responsible individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's trust fund taxes to the department during any period of time that the person was not the chief executive or chief financial officer, that individual is also liable for trust fund tax liability that became due during the period that he or she had the duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the department but was not the chief executive or chief financial officer.(b) All other responsible individuals are liable under this section only for trust fund tax liability that became due during the period he or she had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the department.(5) Persons described in subsection (3)(b) of this section are exempt from liability under this section in situations where nonpayment of the limited liability business entity's trust fund taxes is due to reasons beyond their control as determined by the department by rule.(6) Any person having been issued a notice of assessment under this section is entitled to the appeal procedures under RCW 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, and 82.32.200.(7) This section does not relieve the limited liability business entity of its trust fund tax liability or otherwise impair other tax collection remedies afforded by law.(8) Collection authority and procedures prescribed in this chapter apply to collections under this section.(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Chief executive" means: The president of a corporation; or for other entities or organizations other than corporations or if the corporation does not have a president as one of its officers, the highest ranking executive manager or administrator in charge of the management of the company or organization.(b) "Chief financial officer" means: The treasurer of a corporation; or for entities or organizations other than corporations or if a corporation does not have a treasurer as one of its officers, the highest senior manager who is responsible for overseeing the financial activities of the entire company or organization.(c) "Limited liability business entity" means a type of business entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity, or a business entity that is managed or owned in whole or in part by an entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity. Limited liability business entities include corporations, limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, trusts, general partnerships and joint ventures in which one or more of the partners or parties are also limited liability business entities, and limited partnerships in which one or more of the general partners are also limited liability business entities.(d) "Manager" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.006.(e) "Member" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.006, except that the term only includes members of member-managed limited liability companies.(f) "Officer" means any officer or assistant officer of a corporation, including the president, vice president, secretary, and treasurer.(g)(i) "Responsible individual" includes any current or former officer, manager, member, partner, or trustee of a limited liability business entity with an unpaid tax warrant issued by the department.(ii) "Responsible individual" also includes any current or former employee or other individual, but only if the individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's unpaid trust fund tax liability reflected in a tax warrant issued by the department.(iii) Whenever any taxpayer has one or more limited liability business entities as a member, manager, or partner, "responsible individual" also includes any current and former officers, members, or managers of the limited liability business entity or entities or of any other limited liability business entity involved directly in the management of the taxpayer. For purposes of this subsection (9)(g)(iii), "taxpayer" means a limited liability business entity with an unpaid tax warrant issued against it by the department.(h) "Trust fund taxes" means taxes collected from purchasers and held in trust under RCW 82.08.050, including taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020, 82.08.150, 82.08.817, 82.12.818, ((82.48A.010, 82.48A.020,)) and 82.51.010.(i) "Willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid" means that the failure was the result of an intentional, conscious, and voluntary course of action.Sec. 1502. RCW 82.42.020 and 2022 c 182 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:There is levied upon every distributor of aircraft fuel, an excise tax at the rate of ((18))25 cents on each gallon of aircraft fuel sold, delivered, or used in this state. There must be collected from every user of aircraft fuel either the use tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 or the retail sales tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020. The taxes imposed by this chapter must be collected and paid to the state but once in respect to any aircraft fuel.Sec. 1503. RCW 82.42.090 and 2025 c 417 s 1304 are each amended to read as follows:((All moneys))(1) Seventy-two percent of the revenue collected by the director from the aircraft fuel excise tax as provided in RCW 82.42.020 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and shall be credited to the aeronautics account hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for aviation-related purposes.(2) Twenty-eight percent of the revenue collected by the director from the aircraft fuel excise tax as provided in RCW 82.42.020 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and shall be credited to the sustainable aviation fuel account created in RCW 43.31.645.(3) Moneys collected from the consumer or user of aircraft fuel from either the use tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 or the retail sales tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to the state general fund.Sec. 1504. RCW 47.68.250 and 2021 c 131 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Every aircraft, inclusive of commercial unpiloted aircraft systems, must be registered with the department for each calendar year in which the aircraft is operated or is based within this state. A fee of ((fifteen dollars))$30, to be adjusted annually as provided in (b) of this subsection, is charged for each such registration and each annual renewal thereof.(b) Beginning January 1, 2028, the aircraft registration fee required in (a) of this subsection must be adjusted annually by increasing the fee by two percent and the result must be rounded to the nearest whole dollar.(2) The department must review the fee schedule based on the number of unpiloted aircraft systems registered under any single entity. Consideration should be given to the cost to administer the program and the number of commercial aircraft registered in the state. The department shall collaborate with the department of commerce, the department of revenue, and industry representatives in determining any recommendations to revise the initial fee. The report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.(3) Possession of the appropriate effective federal certificate, permit, rating, or license relating to ownership and airworthiness of the aircraft, and payment of the excise tax imposed by Title 82 RCW for the privilege of using the aircraft within this state during the year for which the registration is sought, and payment of the registration fee required by this section are the only requisites for registration of an aircraft under this section.(4) The registration fee imposed by this section is payable to and collected by the secretary. The fee for any calendar year must be paid during the month of January, and collected by the secretary at the time of the collection by him or her of the excise tax. If the secretary is satisfied that the requirements for registration of the aircraft have been met, he or she must issue to the owner of the aircraft a certificate of registration therefor. The secretary must pay to the state treasurer the registration fees collected under this section((, which registration fees must be credited to the aeronautics account))with 50 percent deposited in the aeronautics account created in RCW 82.42.090 and 50 percent deposited in the sustainable aviation fuel account created in RCW 43.31.645.(5) It is not necessary for the registrant to provide the secretary with originals or copies of federal certificates, permits, ratings, or licenses. The secretary must issue certificates of registration, or such other evidences of registration or payment of fees as he or she may deem proper; and in connection therewith may prescribe requirements for the possession and exhibition of such certificates or other evidences.(6) The provisions of this section do not apply to:(a) An aircraft owned by and used exclusively in the service of any government or any political subdivision thereof, including the government of the United States, any state, territory, or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, which is not engaged in carrying persons or property for commercial purposes;(b) An aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign country;(c) An aircraft that is owned by a nonresident if:(i) The aircraft remains in this state or is based in this state, or both, for a period less than ((ninety))90 days; or(ii) The aircraft is a large private airplane as defined in RCW 82.08.215 and remains in this state for a period of ((ninety))90 days or longer, but only when:(A) The airplane is in this state exclusively for the purpose of repairs, alterations, or reconstruction, including any flight testing related to the repairs, alterations, or reconstruction, or for the purpose of continual storage of not less than one full calendar year;(B) An employee of the facility providing these services is on board the airplane during any flight testing; and(C) Within ((ninety))90 days of the date the airplane first arrived in this state during the calendar year, the nonresident files a written statement with the department indicating that the airplane is exempt from registration under this subsection (6)(c)(ii). The written statement must be filed in a form and manner prescribed by the department and must include such information as the department requires. The department may require additional periodic verification that the airplane remains exempt from registration under this subsection (6)(c)(ii) and that written statements conform with the provisions of chapter 5.50 RCW;(d) A piloted aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying constituting an act of interstate or foreign commerce;(e) An aircraft owned by the commercial manufacturer thereof while being operated for test or experimental purposes, or for the purpose of training crews for purchasers of the aircraft;(f) An aircraft being held for sale, exchange, delivery, test, or demonstration purposes solely as stock in trade of an aircraft dealer licensed under Title 14 RCW;(g) An aircraft based within the state that is in an unairworthy condition, is not operated within the registration period, and has obtained a written exemption issued by the secretary; and(h) Unpiloted aircraft systems used exclusively for hobby or recreation.(7) The secretary must be notified within ((thirty))30 days of any change in ownership of a registered aircraft. The notification must contain the N, NC, NR, NL, or NX number of the aircraft, the full name and address of the former owner, and the full name and address of the new owner. For failure to so notify the secretary, the registration of that aircraft may be canceled by the secretary, subject to reinstatement upon application and payment of a reinstatement fee of ((ten dollars))$10 by the new owner.(8) A municipality or port district that owns, operates, or leases an airport, as defined in RCW 47.68.020, with the intent to operate, must require from an aircraft owner proof of aircraft registration as a condition of leasing or selling tiedown or hangar space for an aircraft. It is the responsibility of the lessee or purchaser to register the aircraft. Proof of registration must be provided according to the following schedule:(a) For the purchase of tiedown or hangar space, the municipality or port district must allow the purchaser ((thirty))30 days from the date of the application for purchase to produce proof of aircraft registration.(b) For the lease of tiedown or hangar space that extends ((thirty))30 days or more, the municipality or port district must allow the lessee ((thirty))30 days to produce proof of aircraft registration from the date of the application for lease of tiedown or hangar space.(c) For the lease of tiedown or hangar space that extends less than ((thirty))30 days, the municipality or port district must allow the lessee to produce proof of aircraft registration at any point prior to the final day of the lease.(9) The airport must work with the aviation division to assist in its efforts to register aircraft by providing information about based aircraft on an annual basis as requested by the division.(10) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 1505. RCW 47.68.250 and 2021 c 131 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Every aircraft, inclusive of commercial unpiloted aircraft systems, must be registered with the department for each calendar year in which the aircraft is operated or is based within this state. A fee of ((fifteen dollars))$30, to be adjusted annually as provided in (b) of this subsection, is charged for each such registration and each annual renewal thereof.(b) Beginning January 1, 2028, the aircraft registration fee required in (a) of this subsection must be adjusted annually by increasing the fee by two percent and the result must be rounded to the nearest whole dollar.(2) The department must review the fee schedule based on the number of unpiloted aircraft systems registered under any single entity. Consideration should be given to the cost to administer the program and the number of commercial aircraft registered in the state. The department shall collaborate with the department of commerce, the department of revenue, and industry representatives in determining any recommendations to revise the initial fee. The report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.(3) Possession of the appropriate effective federal certificate, permit, rating, or license relating to ownership and airworthiness of the aircraft, and payment of the excise tax imposed by Title 82 RCW for the privilege of using the aircraft within this state during the year for which the registration is sought, and payment of the registration fee required by this section are the only requisites for registration of an aircraft under this section.(4) The registration fee imposed by this section is payable to and collected by the secretary. The fee for any calendar year must be paid during the month of January, and must be collected by the secretary at the time of the collection by him or her of the excise tax. If the secretary is satisfied that the requirements for registration of the aircraft have been met, he or she must issue to the owner of the aircraft a certificate of registration therefor. The secretary must pay to the state treasurer the registration fees collected under this section((, which registration fees must be credited to the aeronautics account))with 50 percent deposited in the aeronautics account created in RCW 82.42.090 and 50 percent deposited in the sustainable aviation fuel account created in RCW 43.31.645.(5) It is not necessary for the registrant to provide the secretary with originals or copies of federal certificates, permits, ratings, or licenses. The secretary must issue certificates of registration, or such other evidences of registration or payment of fees as he or she may deem proper; and in connection therewith may prescribe requirements for the possession and exhibition of such certificates or other evidences.(6) The provisions of this section do not apply to:(a) An aircraft owned by and used exclusively in the service of any government or any political subdivision thereof, including the government of the United States, any state, territory, or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, which is not engaged in carrying persons or property for commercial purposes;(b) An aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign country;(c) An aircraft that is owned by a nonresident if:(i) The aircraft remains in this state or is based in this state, or both, for a period less than ((ninety))90 days; or(ii) The aircraft is a large private airplane as defined in RCW 82.08.215 and remains in this state for a period of ((ninety))90 days or longer, but only when:(A) The airplane is in this state exclusively for the purpose of repairs, alterations, or reconstruction, including any flight testing related to the repairs, alterations, or reconstruction, or for the purpose of continual storage of not less than one full calendar year;(B) An employee of the facility providing these services is on board the airplane during any flight testing; and(C) Within ((ninety))90 days of the date the airplane first arrived in this state during the calendar year, the nonresident files a written statement with the department indicating that the airplane is exempt from registration under this subsection (6)(c)(ii). The written statement must be filed in a form and manner prescribed by the department and must include such information as the department requires. The department may require additional periodic verification that the airplane remains exempt from registration under this subsection (6)(c)(ii) and that written statements conform with the provisions of chapter 5.50 RCW;(d) A piloted aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying constituting an act of interstate or foreign commerce;(e) An aircraft owned by the commercial manufacturer thereof while being operated for test or experimental purposes, or for the purpose of training crews for purchasers of the aircraft;(f) An aircraft being held for sale, exchange, delivery, test, or demonstration purposes solely as stock in trade of an aircraft dealer licensed under Title 14 RCW;(g) An aircraft based within the state that is in an unairworthy condition, is not operated within the registration period, and has obtained a written exemption issued by the secretary; and(h) Unpiloted aircraft systems used exclusively for hobby or recreation.(7) The secretary must be notified within ((thirty))30 days of any change in ownership of a registered aircraft. The notification must contain the N, NC, NR, NL, or NX number of the aircraft, the full name and address of the former owner, and the full name and address of the new owner. For failure to so notify the secretary, the registration of that aircraft may be canceled by the secretary, subject to reinstatement upon application and payment of a reinstatement fee of ((ten dollars))$10 by the new owner.(8) A municipality or port district that owns, operates, or leases an airport, as defined in RCW 47.68.020, with the intent to operate, must require from an aircraft owner proof of aircraft registration as a condition of leasing or selling tiedown or hangar space for an aircraft. It is the responsibility of the lessee or purchaser to register the aircraft. Proof of registration must be provided according to the following schedule:(a) For the purchase of tiedown or hangar space, the municipality or port district must allow the purchaser ((thirty))30 days from the date of the application for purchase to produce proof of aircraft registration.(b) For the lease of tiedown or hangar space that extends ((thirty))30 days or more, the municipality or port district must allow the lessee ((thirty))30 days to produce proof of aircraft registration from the date of the application for lease of tiedown or hangar space.(c) For the lease of tiedown or hangar space that extends less than ((thirty))30 days, the municipality or port district must allow the lessee to produce proof of aircraft registration at any point prior to the final day of the lease.(9) The airport must work with the aviation division to assist in its efforts to register aircraft by providing information about based aircraft on an annual basis as requested by the division.(10) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 1506. RCW 82.48.030 and 2013 c 56 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, and as adjusted annually as provided in (c) of this subsection, the amount of the tax imposed by this chapter for each calendar year is as follows:Â ((Type of aircraftRegistration feeÂ Single engine fixed wing$50Â Â Small multi-engine fixed wing65Â Â Large multi-engine fixed wing80Â Â Turboprop multi-engine fixed wing100Â Â Turbojet multi-engine fixed wing125Â Â Helicopter75Â Â Sailplane20Â Â Lighter than air20Â Â Home built20))Â Â Registration Fee ScheduleType of aircraftPart 1Part 2TotalÂ Â Â Â Â Â Â Single engine fixed wing$50$70$120Small multi-engine fixed wing65155220Large multi-engine fixed wing80140220Turboprop multi-engine fixed wing100370470Turbojet multi-engine fixed wing12510951220Helicopter75145220Sailplane20100120Lighter than air20100120Home built20100120Commercial unpiloted aircraft systems0120120(b) The amount of tax, adjusted annually as provided in (c) of this subsection, imposed by this chapter for each calendar year with respect to aircraft owned and operated by a commuter air carrier that is not an airplane company as defined in RCW 84.12.200 is as follows:((Gross maximum take-off weight of the aircraftRegistration feeLess than 4,001 lbs.$5004,001-6,000 lbs.$1,0006,001-8,000 lbs.$2,0008,001-9,000 lbs.$3,0009,001-12,500 lbs.$4,000))Â Registration Fee ScheduleGross maximum take-off weight of the aircraftPart 1Part 2TotalÂ Â Â Â Â Â Â Less than 4,001 lbs.$500$500$10004,001-6,000 lbs.Â 1000Â 1000Â 20006,001-8,000 lbs.Â 2000Â 2000Â 40008,001-9,000 lbs.Â 3000Â 3000Â 60009,001-12,500 lbs.Â 4000Â 4000Â 8000(c) Beginning January 1, 2028, the excise taxes required in (a) and (b) of this subsection must be adjusted annually by increasing the registration fee by two percent and the result must be rounded to the nearest whole dollar.(2)(a) The amount of tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section for each calendar year must be divided into ((twelve))12 parts corresponding to the months of the calendar year and the excise tax upon an aircraft registered for the first time in this state after the last day of any month may only be levied for the remaining months of the calendar year including the month in which the aircraft is being registered. However, the minimum amount payable is ((three dollars))$3.(b) An aircraft is deemed registered for the first time in this state when such aircraft was not previously registered by this state for the year immediately preceding the year in which application for registration is made.Sec. 1507. RCW 82.48.080 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 901 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary must regularly pay to the state treasurer the excise taxes collected under this chapter((, which must be credited by the state treasurer)).(2) All excise taxes collected under part 1 of the registration fee schedule in RCW 82.48.030(1) (a) and (b) must be credited to the aeronautics account for state grants to airports and the administrative expenses associated with grant execution and the collection of excise taxes under this chapter.(3) All excise taxes collected under part 2 of the registration fee schedule in RCW 82.48.030(1) (a) and (b) must be credited to the sustainable aviation fuel account created in RCW 43.31.645.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1508. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 82.48A.010 (Luxury aircraft tax) and 2025 c 417 s 207;(2) RCW 82.48A.020 (Use tax if value of aircraft exceeds $500,000âException) and 2025 c 417 s 208;(3) RCW 82.48A.030 (Deposit for revenue collected) and 2025 c 417 s 209; and(4) RCW 82.48A.040 (Administration) and 2025 c 417 s 210.PART XVI: TOW TRUCK IMPOUNDSSec. 1601. 2025 c 417 s 1406 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:Sections 1307 through 1309 of this act take effect ((February 1, 2026))July 1, 2027.PART XVII: MISCELLANEOUSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1701. Sections 1001, 1201, 1202, 1301, 1302, and 1401 of this act take effect July 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1702. Sections 110, 901, and 902 of this act take effect October 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1703. Sections 1502 and 1503 of this act take effect November 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1704. Sections 1504, 1506, and 1507 of this act take effect January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1705. (1) Section 1001 of this act expires the earlier of July 1, 2028, or when RCW 74.76.040 expires.(2) Section 1002 of this act expires July 1, 2028.(3) Section 1003 of this act expires the earlier of January 1, 2029, or when RCW 74.76.040 expires.(4) Section 1004 of this act expires January 1, 2029.(5) Section 1005 of this act expires when RCW 74.76.040 expires.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1706. (1) Section 1002 of this act takes effect when RCW 74.76.040 expires.(2) Sections 1003 and 1004 of this act take effect July 1, 2028.(3) Sections 1005 and 1006 of this act take effect January 1, 2029.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1707. Section 1504 of this act expires July 1, 2031.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1708. Section 1505 of this act takes effect July 1, 2031.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1709. Sections 1501, 1508, and 1601 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.--- END ---